Utah statutes.
70C-6-201.   Term of insurance.

(1)  Consumer credit insurance provided by a creditor may be subject to the furnishing of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer. Whether or not this evidence is required, the term of the insurance shall commence no later than when the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor or when the debtor applies for the insurance, whichever is later, except as follows:

(a)  if any required evidence of insurability is not furnished until more than 30 days after the term would otherwise commence, the term may commence on the date when the insurer determines the evidence to be satisfactory; or

(b)  if the creditor provides insurance not previously provided covering debts previously created, the term may commence on the effective date of the policy.

(2)  With respect to a closed-end credit agreement, the originally scheduled term of the insurance shall extend at least until the due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt, but may not extend more than 15 days after the originally scheduled due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt unless:

(a)  it is extended without additional cost to the debtor;

(b)  it is extended in connection with a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation; or

(c)  if the debtor is advised in writing that the insurance will be written for a specified shorter time, the term need extend only until the end of the specified time.

(3)  With respect to an open-end credit agreement, if the creditor agrees to provide consumer credit insurance, the creditor shall provide sufficient insurance to pay the unpaid balance in the open-end account at any point in time up to the limit of the line of credit granted, unless the parties to the credit agreement specifically agree in writing the insurance provided may be for a definite or limited term, and may be for a maximum amount less than the unpaid balance in the account at any time or less than the maximum amount of credit authorized.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

